Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 394 Wills
394.410.
Death of part of group of devisees before testator — Children includes grandchildren.

When a devise is made to several as a class or as tenants in common, and one (1) or more of the devisees die before the testator, and another or others survive the testator, the share or shares of such as so die shall go to his or their descendants, if any; if none, to the surviving devisees, unless a different disposition is made by the devisor.

A devise to children embraces grandchildren when there are no children, and no other construction will give effect to the devise.

If a devise is made to several as joint tenants with right of survivorship and one (1) or more of the devisees dies before the testator and another or others survive the testator, the share or shares of such as so die shall go to such as so survive. Provided, however, in the event of the death of all the joint tenants before the death of the testator, the order of death of the joint tenants shall not affect the devolution of the property and, in this case, devolution shall be governed by subsection (1) hereof, as if the devise had been made to the deceased devisees as tenants in common.

History.

2064: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 14.

394.420.
Contribution, when devised estate used for payment of testator’s debt.

When any devised estate, real or personal, is taken from the devisee for the payment of a debt of the testator, or one (1) of the devisees pays such debt to save his devise, each of the other devisees shall contribute his proportion of the debt, interest, and costs to the person paying the same, according to the value received by him.

If the testator has, by will, made other provision for the payment of his debts, subsection (1) shall not apply except to the extent that such provision and the testator’s undevised estate is deficient. The remedy of such devisee in the first instance shall be against the person holding the provision, and against the undevised estate.

History.

2073, 2074.

394.430.
Residuary and other legatees not entitled to contribution.

A residuary legatee, or legatee after or subject to the payment of debts, or a devisee to whom an estate has or shall be devised to pay debts, shall not, after paying such debts, be entitled to contribution.

History.

2075.

394.440.
Specific and general devises — Distinction.

As respects the payment of the testator’s debts, there shall be no distinction between specific and general devises except as provided in this chapter.

History.

2076.

394.450.
Contribution when title to estate devised to heir fails.

When any real or personal estate is devised to any heir at law of the testator, and the title to the estate, or any part thereof, proves invalid, such devisee shall have contribution from the others, unless it appears from the will that such was not the intention of the testator.

History.

2077.

394.460.
Posthumous child — How share made up.

When a testator shall have a posthumous child, the share of such child shall be first taken from the estate not disposed of by the will, if any be left after paying debts and other charges, and the residue shall be made up ratably by the devisees.

History.

2078.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Posthumous child, inheritance by, KRS

391.070

.

394.470.
Posthumous child to make contribution.

A posthumous child shall be considered a devisee under the law of contribution and entitled to all his rights, and liable to all his responsibilities.

History.

2079.

394.480.
Contribution when curtesy or dower taken from devise.

When a widower’s curtesy or widow’s dower is taken, or the survivor’s portion is made up, in whole or in part, from the estate devised to a devisee, such devisee shall have contribution on the principles of KRS

394.420

to

394.490

unless the will otherwise directs, or it is necessarily to be inferred therefrom that the testator intended the same to fall on such devisee.

When a widower or widow loses his jointure by a defect of title, or renounces it in legal manner, and his dower, curtesy or portion is assigned or made up in whole or in part from the estate devised to a devisee, that devisee shall have contribution on the principles of KRS

394.420

to

394.490

.

History.

2081, 2082: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 386, § 87.

394.490.
Law as to property devised subject to lien.

KRS

394.420

to

394.490

shall not affect any statutory provision in relation to property devised which may be subject to a lien.

History.

2083.

394.500.
Void or lapsed devise included in residuary devise.

Unless a contrary intention appears from the will, real or personal estate, comprised in a devise or bequest incapable of taking effect, shall be included in the residuary devise contained in the will.

History.

4843: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 11.

394.510.
Obligee has lien on devise charged with obligation.

When any property is devised subject to or upon the payment by the devisee to another of a sum of money or his doing some other thing, the latter shall have a lien on the legacy for the sum to be paid, or for the value of the thing to be done.

History.

2066.

394.520.
Specific legacy — When payable.

If no time is fixed for the payment of a specific pecuniary legacy, it shall be payable one (1) year after the probate of the will, and carry interest after due.

History.

2065: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 259, § 16, effective July 15, 1980.

394.530.
Purchaser of trust estate — When required to see to application.

Where lands are devised to be sold on special or general trust, or are conveyed or devised to trustees or executors in trust to be sold generally or for any specific purpose, the purchaser shall not be bound to look to the application of the purchase money, unless so expressly required by the conveyance or devise.

History.

4846.

394.540.
Contract to make a will, not to revoke a will or to die intestate.

A contract to make a will or devise, or not to revoke a will or devise or to die intestate, if executed after June 16, 1972, can be established only by:

Provisions of a will stating material provisions of the contract;

An express reference in a will to a contract and extrinsic evidence proving the terms of the contract; or

A writing signed by the decedent evidencing the contract.

The execution of a joint will or mutual wills gives rise to no presumption of a contract not to revoke the will or wills.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 3.

394.550.
Stock legacy to include split shares, dividends, and shares issued in merger and exchange.

A legacy of stock, regardless of whether it is construed to be general or specific, shall include:

All stock split shares attributable to the devised shares;

All stock dividends attributable to the devised shares;

All shares of stock issued as a result of merger, consolidation, reorganization or other similar action, and attributable to the devised shares; and

All shares of stock issued in exchange for and attributable to the devised shares, received by the testator after execution of the will or by his estate after his death, unless there is in the will or a codicil thereto a manifest intention to the contrary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 168, § 4.

394.610.
Right to disclaim succession.

As used in this section, the “legal representative of a living person” includes the person’s conservator, limited conservator, guardian, limited guardian, and attorney-in-fact.

A living person, or the legal representative of a living person, who is an heir, next of kin, devisee, legatee, joint tenant, person succeeding to a disclaimed interest, beneficiary under a testamentary instrument, or appointee under a power of appointment exercised by a testamentary instrument, may disclaim in whole or in part the right of succession to any property or interest therein, including a future interest, by filing a written disclaimer under KRS

394.610

to

394.670

. The right to disclaim shall survive the death of the person having it and may be exercised by the personal representative of such person’s estate without authorization of the court having jurisdiction over the estate of the person. The instrument shall:

Describe the property or interest disclaimed;

Declare the disclaimer and extent thereof; and

Be signed by the disclaimant.

No disclaimer by a living person’s legal representative, except for the person’s attorney-in-fact, shall be made unless the court having jurisdiction of the estate of the disabled, incapacitated, or protected person has authorized the disclaimer. No disclaimer by the person’s attorney-in-fact shall be made unless the instrument governing the attorney-in-fact’s authority expressly authorizes a disclaimer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 1; 1980, ch. 259, § 17, effective July 15, 1980; 1998, ch. 267, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

394.620.
Time and place of filing disclaimer.

An instrument disclaiming a present interest shall be filed not later than nine (9) months after the death of the decedent or the donee of the power.

An instrument disclaiming a future interest shall be filed not later than nine (9) months after the event that determines that the taker of the property or interest is finally ascertained and his interest indefeasibly vested.

The disclaimer shall be filed in the District Court of the county in which proceedings have been commenced for the administration of the estate of the deceased owner or deceased donee of the power or, if they have not been commenced, in which they could be commenced. A copy of the disclaimer shall be delivered in person or mailed by registered or certified mail to any personal representative, or other fiduciary of the decedent or donee of the power. If real property or an interest therein is disclaimed, a copy of the disclaimer may be recorded in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the real estate is situated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 2; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 367, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 259, § 18, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Bozell, Disclaimer Trusts: A Flexible Choice for Many Couples in the Face of an Uncertain Future for the Estate Tax, Vol. 70, No. 1, January 2006, Ky. Bench & Bar 7.

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, A Primer on Kentucky Intestacy Laws, 82 Ky. L.J. 29 (1993-94).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Disclaimer of Transfer at Death, Form 230.17.

394.630.
Effect of disclaimer.

Unless the decedent or donee of the power has otherwise provided, the property or interest disclaimed devolves as if the disclaimant had predeceased the decedent or, if the disclaimant is designated to take under a power of appointment exercised by a testamentary instrument, as if the disclaimant had predeceased the donee of the power. A future interest that takes effect in possession or enjoyment after the termination of the estate or interest disclaimed takes effect as if the disclaimant had predeceased the decedent or the donee of the power. A disclaimer relates back for all purposes to the date of the death of the decedent or the donee of the power.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 3.

394.640.
Waiver and bar.

The right to disclaim property or an interest therein is barred by (a) an assignment, conveyance, encumbrance, pledge, or transfer of the property or interest, or a contract therefor, (b) a written waiver of the right to disclaim, (c) an acceptance of the property or interest or benefit thereunder, or (d) a sale of the property or interest under judicial sale made before the disclaimer is effected.

The right to disclaim exists notwithstanding any limitation on the interest of the disclaimant in the nature of a spendthrift provision or similar restriction.

The disclaimer or the written waiver of the right to disclaim is binding upon the disclaimant or person waiving and all persons claiming through or under him.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 4.

394.650.
Exclusiveness of remedy.

KRS

394.610

to

394.670

does not abridge the right of a person to waive, release, disclaim, or renounce property or an interest therein under any other statute.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, A Primer on Kentucky Intestacy Laws, 82 Ky. L.J. 29 (1993-94).

394.660.
Application. [Repealed.]

394.670.
Uniformity of application and construction.

KRS

394.610

to

394.670

shall be applied and construed to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of KRS

394.610

to

394.670

among states enacting it.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 7.

394.680.
Short title.

KRS

394.610

to

394.670

may be cited as the Uniform Disclaimer of Transfers by Will, Intestacy, or Appointment Act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 329, § 8.